Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.170

Appeal—No bond required.

No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a finding of the department affecting the claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.

[ 1998 c 341 s 18.]